North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120C. Lobbying.
Article 2. Registration.

§ 120C-200.
Lobbyist registration procedure.

A lobbyist shall file a separate registration statement for each principal the lobbyist represents with the Secretary of State before engaging in any lobbying. It shall be unlawful for an individual to lobby without registering within one business day of engaging in any lobbying as defined in G.S. 120C-100(a)(17) unless exempted by this Chapter.

The form of the registration shall be prescribed by the Secretary of State, be filed electronically, and shall include the registrant’s full name, firm, complete address, and telephone number; the registrant’s place of business; the full name, complete address, and telephone number of each principal the lobbyist represents; and a general description of the matters on which the registrant expects to act as a lobbyist.

Each lobbyist shall electronically file an amended registration form with the Secretary of State no later than 10 business days after any change in the information supplied in the lobbyist’s last registration under subsection (b) of this section. Each supplementary registration shall include a complete statement of the information that has changed.

Unless a resignation is filed under

G.S. 120C-210

, each registration statement of a lobbyist required under this Chapter shall be effective from the date of filing until January 1 of the following year. The lobbyist shall file a new registration statement after that date, and the applicable fee shall be due and payable.

Each lobbyist shall identify himself or herself as a lobbyist prior to engaging in lobbying communications or activities with a designated individual. The lobbyist shall also disclose the identity of the lobbyist principal connected to that lobbying communication or activity.

In addition to the information required for registration under subsection (b) of this section, former employees of a State agency who register as a lobbyist within six months after voluntary separation or separation for cause from employment with a State agency shall also indicate which State agency with which the former employee was employed.

History.

1933, c. 11, s. 2; 1973, c. 1451; 1975, c. 820, s. 1; 1983, c. 713, s. 51; 1991, c. 740, s. 1.1; 2004-203, s. 50(a); 2006-201, s. 18; 2008-213, ss. 13, 90; 2009-549, s. 3; 2010-169, s. 4(c); 2013-360, s. 27.1(c); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 120C-201.
Lobbyist’s registration fee.

A fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) is due and payable to the Secretary of State at the time of each lobbyist registration. Fees so collected shall be deposited in the General Fund of the State. The fees required under this section shall be paid electronically.

History.

1975, c. 852, s. 1; 1983, c. 713, s. 50; 1991, c. 740, s. 1.1; 2002-126, s. 29A.33; 2005-456, s. 1; 2006-201, s. 18; 2013-360, s. 27.1(a), (d); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 120C-202 through 120C-205.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 120C-206.
Lobbyist principal’s authorization.

A written authorization signed by the lobbyist principal authorizing the lobbyist to represent the principal shall be filed with the Secretary of State within 20 business days after the lobbyist’s registration. If the written authorization is filed more than 20 business days after the lobbyist’s registration and before January 1 of the following year, the lobbyist registration is effective from the date of filing of the lobbyist registration and all reports due under Article 4 of this Chapter shall be filed.

The form of the written authorization shall be prescribed by the Secretary of State, be filed electronically, and shall include the lobbyist principal’s full name, complete address, and telephone number, name and title of any official authorized to sign for the lobbyist principal, and the name of each lobbyist registered to represent that principal.

An amended authorization shall be electronically filed with the Secretary of State no later than 10 business days after any change in the information on the principal’s authorization. Each supplementary authorization shall include a complete statement of the information that has changed.

History.

1933, c. 11, s. 4; 1961, c. 1151; 1975, c. 820, s. 1; 1991, c. 740, s. 1.1; 2005-456, s. 1; 2006-201, s. 18; 2007-347, s. 4; 2008-213, s. 90; 2009-549, s. 4; 2013-360, s. 27.1(e); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 120C-207.
Lobbyist principal’s fees.

A fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) is due and payable to the Secretary of State at the time the principal’s first authorization statement is filed each calendar year for a lobbyist. Fees so collected shall be deposited in the General Fund of the State. The fees required under this section shall be paid electronically.

History.

1933, c. 11, s. 4; 1961, c. 1151; 1975, c. 820, s. 1; 1991, c. 740, s. 1.1; 2005-456, s. 1; 2006-201, s. 18; 2008-213, s. 90; 2013-360, s. 27.1(b), (f); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 120C-208,
120C-209.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 120C-210.
Resignation and termination.

A registration of a lobbyist under

G.S. 120C-200

and the written authorization of that lobbyist principal under

G.S. 120C-206

are terminated upon the filing of either a lobbyist resignation or a principal termination with the Secretary of State, whichever occurs first.

Lobbyist resignations and lobbyist principal terminations are effective upon filing.

History.

2009-549, s. 5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 120C-211 through 120C-214.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 120C-215.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-146, s. 4.1(b), effective December 27, 2018.

History.

2006-201, s. 18; 2007-348, s. 11; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); repealed by 2018-146, s. 4.1(b).

§§ 120C-216 through 120C-219.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 120C-220.
Publication and availability of registrations.

The Secretary of State shall make available as soon as practicable the registrations of the lobbyists and liaison personnel in an electronic, searchable format.

The Secretary of State shall make available as soon as practicable the authorizations of the lobbyists’ principals in an electronic, searchable format.

The Secretary of State shall make available as soon as practicable the registrations of other persons required by this Chapter to file a registration in an electronic, searchable format.

Within 20 days after the convening of each session of the General Assembly, the Secretary of State shall furnish each designated individual and the State Legislative Library a list of all persons who have registered as lobbyists and whom they represent. A supplemental list of lobbyists shall be furnished periodically every 20 days while the General Assembly is in session and every 60 days thereafter. For each special session of the General Assembly, a supplemental list of lobbyists shall be furnished to the State Legislative Library.

All lists required by this section may be furnished electronically.

History.

2006-201, s. 18; 2008-213, s. 15; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 120C-221 through 120C-299.

Reserved for future codification purposes.